Connecticut, session 2026, SB00292.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 53a-193 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
The following definitions are applicable to this section and sections
53a-194 to 53a-210, inclusive:
(1) Any material or performance is "obscene" if, (A) taken as a whole,
it predominantly appeals to the prurient interest, (B) it depicts or
describes in a patently offensive way a prohibited sexual act, and (C)
taken as a whole, it lacks serious literary, artistic, educational, political
or scientific value. Predominant appeal shall be judged with reference
to ordinary adults unless it appears from the character of the material or
performance or the circumstances of its dissemination to be designed
for some other specially susceptible audience. Whether a material or
performance is obscene shall be judged by ordinary adults applying
SB292 / File No. 646 1

SB292 File No. 646
contemporary community standards. In applying contemporary
community standards, the state of Connecticut is deemed to be the
community.
(2) Material or a performance is "obscene as to minors" if it depicts a
prohibited sexual act and, taken as a whole, it is harmful to minors. For
purposes of this subdivision: (A) "Minor" means any person less than
seventeen years old as used in section 53a-196 and less than sixteen
years old as used in sections 53a-196a and 53a-196b, and (B) "harmful to
minors" means that quality of any description or representation, in
whatever form, of a prohibited sexual act, when (i) it predominantly
appeals to the prurient, shameful or morbid interest of minors, (ii) it is
patently offensive to prevailing standards in the adult community as a
whole with respect to what is suitable material for minors, and (iii) taken
as a whole, it lacks serious literary, artistic, educational, political or
scientific value for minors.
(3) "Prohibited sexual act" means erotic fondling, nude performance,
sexual excitement, sado-masochistic abuse, masturbation or sexual
intercourse.
(4) "Nude performance" means the showing of the human male or
female genitals, pubic area or buttocks with less than a fully opaque
covering, or the showing of the female breast with less than a fully
opaque covering of any portion thereof below the top of the nipple, or
the depiction of covered male genitals in a discernibly turgid state in
any play, motion picture, dance or other exhibition performed before an
audience.
(5) "Erotic fondling" means touching a person's clothed or unclothed
genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or if such person is a female, breast.
(6) "Sexual excitement" means the condition of human male or female
genitals when in a state of sexual stimulation or arousal.
(7) "Sado-masochistic abuse" means flagellation or torture by or upon
a person clad in undergarments, a mask or bizarre costume, or the
SB292 / File No. 646 2

SB292 File No. 646
condition of being fettered, bound or otherwise physically restrained on
the part of one so clothed.
(8) "Masturbation" means the real or simulated touching, rubbing or
otherwise stimulating a person's own clothed or unclothed genitals,
pubic area, buttocks, or, if the person is female, breast, either by manual
manipulation or with an artificial instrument.
(9) "Sexual intercourse" means intercourse, real or simulated,
whether genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital or oral-anal, whether
between persons of the same or opposite sex or between a human and
an animal, or with an artificial genital.
(10) "Material" means anything tangible which is capable of being
used or adapted to arouse prurient, shameful or morbid interest,
whether through the medium of reading, observation, sound or in any
other manner. Undeveloped photographs, molds, printing plates, and
the like, may be deemed obscene notwithstanding that processing or
other acts may be required to make the obscenity patent or to
disseminate it.
(11) "Performance" means any play, motion picture, dance or other
exhibition performed before an audience.
(12) "Promote" means to manufacture, issue, sell, give, provide, lend,
mail, deliver, transfer, transmit, publish, distribute, circulate,
disseminate, present, exhibit, advertise, produce, direct or participate in.
(13) "Child sexual abuse material" means any visual depiction
including any photograph, film, videotape, picture or computer-
generated image or picture, whether made or produced by electronic,
digital, mechanical or other means, of sexually explicit conduct, where
the production of such visual depiction involves the use of a person
under sixteen years of age, or the subject of such visual depiction
appears indistinguishable from a person under sixteen years of age,
engaging in sexually explicit conduct, provided whether the subject of
a visual depiction was a person under sixteen years of age at the time
SB292 / File No. 646 3

SB292 File No. 646
the visual depiction was created is a question to be decided by the trier
of fact.
(14) "Sexually explicit conduct" means actual or simulated (A) sexual
intercourse, including genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital or oral-
anal physical contact, whether between persons of the same or opposite
sex, or with an artificial genital, (B) bestiality, (C) masturbation, (D)
sadistic or masochistic abuse, or (E) lascivious exhibition of the genitals
or pubic area of any person.
(15) "Visual depiction" includes undeveloped film and videotape and
data, as defined in subdivision (8) of section 53a-250, that is capable of
conversion into a visual image and includes encrypted data.
(16) A visual depiction of a subject when described as
"indistinguishable" means virtually indistinguishable, in that the visual
depiction is such that an ordinary person viewing the visual depiction
would conclude that the subject of the visual depiction is an actual
person under sixteen years of age engaging in sexually explicit conduct.
"Indistinguishable" is not applicable to a visual depiction that is a
drawing, cartoon, sculpture or painting of a person under sixteen years
of age.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 53a-193
JUD Joint Favorable
SB292 / File No. 646 4

SB292 File No. 646
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Correction, Dept.; Judicial Dept. GF - Potential Minimal Minimal
(Probation) Cost
Resources of the General Fund GF - Potential Minimal Minimal
Revenue Gain
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill expands the definition of “child sexual abuse material”,
resulting in a potential cost to the Department of Correction and the
Judicial Department for incarceration or probation and a potential
revenue gain to the General Fund from fines.1 On average, the marginal
cost to the state for incarcerating an offender for the year is $3,3002 while
the average marginal cost for supervision in the community is less than
$6003 each year for adults and $450 each year for juveniles.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
Between FY 22 and FY 25, there were a total of 303 offenses recorded and $755 in fines
collected under CGS §§ 53a-196c through 53a-196h. About 80 individuals are currently
incarcerated under these statutes.
Inmate marginal cost is based on increased consumables (e.g., food, clothing, water,
sewage, living supplies, etc.) This does not include a change in staffing costs or utility
expenses because these expenses would only be realized if a unit or facility opened.
Probation marginal cost is based on services provided by private providers and only
includes costs that increase with each additional participant. This does not include a
cost for additional supervision by a probation officer unless a new offense is
anticipated to result in enough additional offenders to require additional probation
officers.
SB292 / File No. 646 5

SB292 File No. 646
continue into the future subject to the number of offenses and fines
collected.
SB292 / File No. 646 6

SB292 File No. 646
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 292
AN ACT CONCERNING THE DEFINITION OF "CHILD SEXUAL
ABUSE MATERIAL".